Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 General Provisions

27-4-130.
Authority to close salt waters; notice; regulations prohibiting sale of seafood.

The commissioner shall have the power to close all or any portion of the salt waters of this state to commercial and noncommercial fishing by species for a period not to exceed six months within a calendar year. Any determination to close the salt waters pursuant to this subsection or to reopen such waters shall be made in accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a person from landing in this state any fish or seafood taken in federal waters pursuant to a valid commercial federal permit.

For the purposes of enforcing this article, the department is authorized to zone the salt waters of this state.

Public notice of the opening or closing of salt waters as provided in this article shall be given by posting a notice of such opening or closing at the courthouse in each coastal county and by such other means as may appear feasible to inform interested persons of the opening or closing. Such notices shall be posted at least 24 hours prior to any enforcement action taken pursuant to this Code section.

In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to prohibit the sale of any or all seafood in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-130

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 18/HB 869.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to factors governing the decision to open or close salt waters and public notice thereof.
The former Code section was based on Code 1933, § 45-900, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27.

27-4-130.1.
[Repealed] Open seasons, creel and possession limits, and minimum size limits for certain finfish species.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-130.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1406, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1651, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 605, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 570, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 27; Ga. L. 2001, p. 325, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 809, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1232, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 219, § 1/HB 1085; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 27/SB 103; Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 10/SB 474; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 19/HB 869, effective January 1, 2013.

27-4-130.2.
[Repealed] Taking or possession of Atlantic billfish prohibited; catch and release exception.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-130.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 325, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 19/HB 869, effective January 1, 2013.

27-4-131.
[Reserved] Zoning of salt waters.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 202, § 4; Code 1933, § 45-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 20/HB 869, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 20/HB 869 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 2013.

27-4-132.
Fishing for shrimp for noncommercial purposes generally.

In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing the seasons, days, and places; methods of fishing and disposition; and size, creel, and possession limits for noncommercial fishing for shrimp. Except as otherwise provided by law, it shall be unlawful to fish for shrimp for noncommercial purposes in the salt waters of the State of Georgia except by means established by the board. The determination of whether to open or close a river or creek or a portion thereof for fishing for shrimp shall be made by the commissioner in accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management.

Reserved.

It shall be unlawful to fish for shrimp except at such times and places as the commissioner may establish. The commissioner is authorized to open or close any or a portion of the salt waters of this state to fishing for food shrimp at any time between May 15 and the last day of February if the commissioner has determined that such action in opening or closing such waters is in accordance with current sound principles of wildlife research and management.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-902.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 2004, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 9; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 9/HB 100; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 21/HB 869.

27-4-132.1.
Limit on amount of shrimp fished by cast net; penalty for violation.

No person or group of persons occupying the same boat fishing for shrimp for noncommercial purposes by means of a food shrimp cast net may take more than 48 quarts of shrimp with heads or 30 quarts of shrimp tails in any day. No such person or group of persons occupying the same vessel may possess at any time more than 48 quarts of shrimp with heads or 30 quarts of shrimp tails.

Reserved.

No group of persons occupying the same boat, one or more of whom is in possession of a commercial food shrimp cast netting license and who are fishing for shrimp by means of a food shrimp cast net, may take more than 150 quarts of shrimp with heads or 95 quarts of shrimp tails taken by such cast net or a combination of a cast net and a seine in any day; provided, however, that beginning December 1 and until the close of each food shrimp season, possession shall be limited to 75 quarts of shrimp with heads or 48 quarts of shrimp tails in any day.

No such group of persons occupying the same vessel may possess at any time more than 150 quarts of shrimp with heads or 95 quarts of shrimp tails; provided, however, that beginning December 1 and until the close of each food shrimp season, no such group of persons occupying the same vessel may possess at any time more than 75 quarts of shrimp with heads or 48 quarts of shrimp tails.

No one person fishing for shrimp solely by means of a seine, whether such person is acting alone or in a group of persons, may take more than 24 quarts of shrimp with heads or 15 quarts of shrimp tails in any day. No such person may possess at any time more than 24 quarts of shrimp with heads or 15 quarts of shrimp tails. If any person or group of persons are in possession of a food shrimp cast net and a seine, such person or group of persons shall be subject to the limits imposed upon taking shrimp by food shrimp cast net.

No person or group of persons fishing for food shrimp for commercial purposes shall have on board a vessel any cast net other than a food shrimp cast net.

Reserved.

No vessel owner shall allow the vessel to be used by any person or persons to take more than the legal quantity allowable in any day regardless of the number of trips made or the duration of any trip by such vessel. It shall be unlawful for any vessel owner or operator to allow a vessel to be left anchored and unoccupied for the purpose of receiving shrimp taken by the occupant of any other vessel.

Violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

In addition to any criminal penalties assessed, any person violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall pay a civil penalty in the amount of $50.00 for each quart of shrimp taken or possessed in excess of the allowable limit.

Whenever the commissioner or his or her designee has reason to believe that any person has violated subsection (a) of this Code section or any rule or regulation promulgated to implement such subsection, he or she may request and shall receive a hearing before an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings acting in place of the Board of Natural Resources, as provided by Code Section 50-13-41. Upon finding that such person has violated subsection (a) of this Code section, the administrative law judge shall impose a civil penalty in the amount of $50.00 for each quart of shrimp taken or possessed in excess of the allowable limit. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute a final decision in the matter, and any party to the hearing, including the commissioner, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-132.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 4, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 10; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 10/HB 100.

27-4-133.
Lawful nets; opening and closing waters; identification on boats fishing for shrimp.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, it shall be unlawful for any person to use a power-drawn net in any of the salt waters of this state for commercial shrimping for human consumption. All sounds shall be closed to such fishing, except that the commissioner may open Cumberland, St. Simons, Sapelo, St. Andrew, Wassaw, or Ossabaw sounds or any combination of such sounds at any time between September 1 and December 31, provided that he or she has determined that the shrimp in the waters of each sound to be opened are 45 or fewer shrimp with heads on to the pound; and the commissioner shall close each sound so opened when he or she has determined that the shrimp in the waters of the sound exceed 45 shrimp with heads on to the pound. The commissioner may open any waters outside, on the seaward side, of the sounds between May 15 and December 31, provided that he or she has determined that the shrimp in such outside waters are 45 or fewer shrimp with heads on to the pound; and the commissioner shall close the waters so opened when he or she has determined that the shrimp in such outside waters exceed 45 shrimp with heads on to the pound. The commissioner may open any waters outside the sounds during the months of January and February, provided that he or she has determined that the shrimp in such outside waters are 50 or fewer shrimp with heads on to the pound; and the commissioner shall close such outside waters so opened when he or she has determined that the shrimp in such outside waters exceed 50 shrimp with heads on to the pound. The department shall conduct inspections for such shrimp count, and a determination by the commissioner shall be conclusive as to the count. The commissioner shall provide public notice of the opening and closing of such waters, as provided in this Code section, by posting a notice of all openings and closings at the courthouse and on all shrimp docks and by such other means as may appear feasible. The notices shall be posted at least 24 hours prior to any change in the opening and closing of any such waters, provided that such notice is required only when waters are opened or closed by action of the commissioner.

(a.1) (1)

It shall be unlawful to fish for shrimp for human consumption with any trawl or trawls having a total foot-rope length greater than 220 feet, not including the foot-rope length of a single trawl not greater than 16 feet when used as a try net. Foot-rope shall be measured from brail line to brail line, first tie to last tie on the bottom line. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to vessels having a maximum draft of seven feet or less when fully loaded. The department is authorized to exempt trawls used by persons holding a valid scientific collection permit granted by the department.

Reserved.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, it shall be unlawful to fish with nets other than cast nets in any of the tidal rivers or creeks, except to fish for shad, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed so as to prohibit any person from using a beach seine along any public beach.

The department shall have the power to close all or any portion of the salt waters of this state to commercial and recreational fishing in the event of a disaster likely to cause seafood to be unfit for human consumption or in the event of any other emergency situation.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit any person from fishing in the salt waters of this state for shrimp to be used or sold for live bait pursuant to Code Section 27-4-171, provided that it shall be unlawful to fish for shrimp for bait with any trawl equipment which has been used to fish for shrimp pursuant to this Code section.

In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the commissioner may authorize any person to fish for crabs, jellyfish, or whelks with power-drawn nets of four-inch stretched mesh from any waters outside, on the seaward side, of the sounds at any time during the year, or from the waters of Cumberland, St. Simons, Sapelo, St. Andrew, Wassaw, and Ossabaw sounds during the months of January, February, and March, when the commissioner has determined that fishing for crabs, jellyfish, or whelks within such waters will not be detrimental to the conservation of crabs, jellyfish, whelks, or shrimp. Possession of any net with mesh smaller than that provided in this subsection while taking crabs, jellyfish, or whelks shall be prima-facie evidence of the violation of this Code section.

It shall be unlawful for any person fishing for shrimp for commercial purposes pursuant to this Code section to fail to have positioned on the bow or cabin of the boat taking such shrimp a board with a background color of daylight fluorescent orange and with such numerals and letters painted or affixed thereon as are specified by the department for the boat. The numerals and letters shall be at least 16 inches in height, black in color, of block character, and spaced so as to be readable from the air from left to right.

Any determination to open or close the salt waters pursuant to this Code section shall be made in accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management.

(2)

A vessel operator who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $500.00 nor more than $2,500.00, imprisoned for not longer than 30 days, or both, and any trawl on board the vessel shall be contraband and forfeited in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, § 34; Code 1933, § 45-512; Ga. L. 1952, p. 77, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 491, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 94; Ga. L. 1956, p. 590, §§ 12, 13, 20; Ga. L. 1964, p. 174, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 270, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 202, § 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 961, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1170, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1175, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1552, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 36; Ga. L. 1981, p. 688, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 11/HB 100; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 22/HB 869; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-20/HB 233.

Cross references.

Factors to be considered in opening and closing salt waters in accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife management and research, §

27-4-130

.

Opening and closing of salt waters for sport bait shrimping, §

27-4-170

.

Access of salt waters for shrimping by bait dealers, §

27-4-171

.

Numbering requirements for watercraft generally, § 52-7-5 et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “30” was substituted for “thirty” in paragraph (a.1)(2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, an extra comma was deleted following “management,” in the first sentence of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 797, § 1, which amended this Code section, purported to amend paragraph (a)(1) but actually amended paragraph (a.1)(1).

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

27-4-134.
Requirements for commercial fishing boat license; penalty for violation.

Upon application for a commercial fishing boat license under Code Section 27-2-8, the owner of such boat, if said boat is to be used for fishing with power-drawn nets in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 27-4-133, must do one of the following:

Post a cash forfeiture bond in the form prescribed by the board in favor of the State of Georgia in the amount of $5,000.00, conditioned upon faithful compliance with Code Section 27-4-133;

File with the commissioner a forfeiture bond in the form prescribed by the board executed by a bonding, surety, or insurance company licensed to do business in this state in favor of the state in the amount of $5,000.00, conditioned upon faithful compliance with Code Section 27-4-133; or

File with the commissioner an affidavit in the form prescribed by the board stating that the affiant is a resident of the State of Georgia, that he is the sole owner of the boat to be licensed, and that the boat is free from all encumbrances, including but not limited to liens, mortgages, and other evidences of security interests. The department may require proof of residence or ownership or proof of residence and ownership. The affidavit shall acknowledge that the boat sought to be licensed will be subject to Code Section 27-4-137. The affidavit shall be filed by the department in the office of the clerk of the superior court as follows: when the owner is an individual, then in the county where he resides; when the owner is a partnership, corporation, or business entity other than an individual, then in the county of the owner’s principal place of business. The affidavit shall be filed by the clerk like other security interests on boats; provided, however, that the filing of such affidavit shall not be permissible where the boat is documented under the laws of the United States.

The term of the bond provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be for one year and shall correspond to the period of the license. When such a bond has been filed, Code Section 27-4-137 shall not apply to the boat covered by the bond. The commissioner shall have the right to recover on the bond for the breach of its conditions whenever said boat is used in violation of Code Section 27-4-133 or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, either with or without the knowledge, consent, or acquiescence of the owner of the boat. The recovery shall be:

For the first violation, $1,000.00; and

For each subsequent violation within the period of any license, $4,000.00.

Every breach or violation shall carry over to all succeeding bonds filed under this Code section. The aggregate liability shall not exceed the amount of the bond. However, in the event that the total amount of any bond is forfeited, the commercial fishing boat license shall be suspended until a new bond in the amount of $10,000.00 is filed covering the remainder of the period of the license. Until the new bond is filed, any commercial use of the boat shall be unlawful; and the owner shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to alter or affect the seizure and civil forfeiture, under Code Section 27-4-137, of any boat not covered by the bonds provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1173, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 428, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1552, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1012, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-21/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

27-4-135.
Maintenance of records by sellers; reports of oysters and clams harvested.

Reserved.
Repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 4, effective July 1, 1991.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 15; Code 1933, § 45-911, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 41.

27-4-136.
Seafood dealer license; maintenance of records; purchase of seafood.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate as a seafood dealer or to own or operate shellfish canning or shucking facilities or otherwise deal in purchasing, landing, packing, or supplying raw shrimp, shellfish, crabs, fish, or other seafood for commercial purposes without having a valid seafood dealer license as provided for in Code Section 27-2-23.

It shall be unlawful for any person required to have a seafood dealer license to fail to keep a record in which is entered the amount of shrimp, shellfish, crabs, fish, or other seafood taken from Georgia waters for commercial purposes; the name of each person from whom purchased; the date and price of purchase; the grade and quantity purchased; the name, number, and approximate tonnage of the boat in which they were brought to the facility; the number of calendar days expended in harvesting the product; the approximate location or locations of harvest; the quantity canned and packed for shipment; the date and amount of each shipment; and such other information as the department requires.

Each person required to maintain records pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection shall report such information to the department, whose address for the purpose of reporting shall be the Coastal Resource Division headquarters, at such times and in such manner as the board provides by rule or regulation.

It shall be unlawful for any master collecting permittee to fail to maintain records in a form as prescribed by the Department of Agriculture.

It shall be unlawful for any person required to have a seafood dealer license to purchase seafood from any person other than a properly licensed seafood harvester or another seafood dealer.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, § 23; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Code 1933, § 45-818; Ga. L. 1943, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 374, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 112; Code 1933, § 45-919, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-917, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 46; Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 12/HB 100; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 16/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added paragraph (a)(1); redesignated former paragraph (a)(1) as present paragraph (a)(2); substituted “required to have a seafood dealer license” for “owning or operating shellfish canning or shucking facilities or otherwise dealing in purchasing, landing, packing, or supplying raw shrimp, shellfish, crabs, fish, or other seafood for commercial purposes” near the beginning of paragraph (a)(2); redesignated former paragraph (a)(2) as present paragraph (a)(3); substituted “paragraph (2)” for “paragraph (1)” in paragraph (a)(3); and added subsection (c). See Editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-4-137.
Civil forfeiture proceedings.

Each boat, propulsion unit, net, door, boom, winch, cable, electronic device, or accessory equipment used in violation of Code Section 27-4-133 or 27-4-171 is declared to be contraband and forfeited to the state in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9; provided, however, that:

Forfeiture shall only be done in accordance with Code Section 9-16-12 and the property shall be described only in general terms; and

The holder of any bona fide lien on the property shall be protected to the full extent of the lien, but only if the lien was perfected prior to the filing by the department of the affidavit provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 27-4-134, provided that the state shall not be obligated beyond the proceeds of any such sale less the actual costs incurred.

The Attorney General may, upon the request of the commissioner, aid the district attorney in the in rem proceeding arising from any seizure or confiscation of property.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 491, § 6; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 94; Ga. L. 1970, p. 961, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 795, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 428, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 11; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 23/HB 869; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-22/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

27-4-138.
Penalties for offenses pertaining to operation of commercial fishing boats engaged in illegal fishing with power-drawn nets.

As used in this Code section, the term “fishing day” means any day in any period during which the waters of this state are open to commercial shrimping pursuant to Code Section 27-4-133 and any administrative order of the commissioner.

Any person on board any commercial fishing boat who violates or causes to be violated the provisions of Code Section 27-4-133 or of Code Section 52-7-13 with regard to waters identified in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of such Code section, which violation occurs not more than one-fourth mile within any waters which are closed or declared a boating safety zone at the time of the violation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished as such, subject to minimum punishment as follows:

For the first offense, the person shall be fined not less than $500.00;

For the second offense, the person shall be fined not less than $1,500.00 and given a mandatory suspension from any commercial fishing for ten fishing days; and

For the third or any subsequent offense, the person shall be fined not less than $5,000.00 and given a mandatory suspension from any commercial fishing for 60 fishing days.

Any person in command of any commercial fishing boat who violates or causes to be violated the provisions of Code Section 27-4-133, which violation occurs one-fourth mile or more within any waters which are closed at the time of the violation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished as such, subject to minimum punishment as follows:

For the first offense, the person shall be fined not less than $5,000.00 and given a mandatory suspension from any commercial fishing for 60 fishing days;

For the second offense, the person shall be fined not less than $10,000.00 and given a mandatory suspension from any commercial fishing for 120 fishing days; and

For the third or any subsequent offense, the person shall be fined not less than $10,000.00 and given a mandatory suspension from any commercial fishing for one year.

Any person who violates a mandatory suspension provided for in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection shall, upon a proper showing, be subject to imprisonment for a period not to exceed 12 months.

It is the responsibility of every person operating a commercial fishing boat to determine whether or not the boat has a license which is valid and in effect. Any person who is engaged in illegal fishing with power-drawn nets while operating a boat which has not been licensed or which has had its license suspended and not reinstated shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a mandatory minimum sentence as follows:

For the first offense, the person shall be fined not less than $2,500.00 or sentenced to not less than 30 days’ nor more than 12 months’ imprisonment, or both; and

For the second offense, the person shall be fined not less than $5,000.00 and given a mandatory suspension from any fishing for not less than five years. Any person who violates such mandatory suspension shall, upon a proper showing, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed 12 months.

For purposes of this Code section, “illegal fishing with power-drawn nets” means any violation of Code Section 27-4-133 or 27-4-171.

Adjudication of guilt or imposition of sentence shall not be suspended, probated, deferred, or withheld for any offense punishable under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 202, § 5; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1173, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 428, § 4; Code 1933, § 45-904, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 490, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 364, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1012, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 13.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 364, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be effective on April 1, 1988, and shall apply to all violations of Code Section 27-4-133 which occur on or after that date.”

27-4-139.
[Reserved] Taking of shrimp for recreational purposes; lawful nets and use of shrimp; penalty for violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 14; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 13, effective July 1, 2007.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 13 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2007.

27-4-140.
Penalties for using recreational food shrimp cast netting.

Any enforcement officer or other law enforcement officer who discovers an illegal cast net being used on the waters of this state shall confiscate the net, which shall be forfeited.

Any person convicted of using an illegal cast net to fish for shrimp from the waters of this state for commercial sale for food purposes shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person convicted for the second or any subsequent time of using an illegal cast net shall, in addition to any other penalty imposed by law, forfeit the vessel on which the violation occurred and in addition all commercial fishing and boat licenses issued to such person shall be revoked in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 27-2-25.

Any person convicted of illegally fishing for shrimp from the waters of this state for commercial sale for food purposes shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Possession of a quantity of shrimp in excess of the noncommercial food shrimp possession limit allowed pursuant to Code Section 27-4-132.1 shall be prima-facie evidence of the intent of the person or persons so in possession to take shrimp for commercial purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 14; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 14/HB 100.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Commercial crabbing, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Natural Resources, Saltwater Fishing Regulations, § 391-2-4.07.